Hawaii statutes.
[§708-835.7] Theft of copper. (1) A
person commits the offense of theft of copper if the person commits theft of
copper that weighs a pound or more, but not including legal tender of the
United States.

(2) Theft of copper is a class C felony. [L
2007, c 197, §§2, 7; am L 2009, c 44, §1]

Cross References

Scrap dealer requirements, see chapter 445, pt X.

COMMENTARY ON §708-835.7

Act 197, Session Laws 2007, established theft of copper as a
felony offense, to deter the theft of copper. The offense applies to copper
weighing a pound or more. Act 197 has a sunset date of July 1, 2009.
Conference Committee Report No. 70.

Act 44, Session Laws 2009, made permanent the offense of
theft of copper, as well as the documentation requirements for the sale of
copper to scrap metal dealers and related penalties. The legislature found
that the prohibitions, record-keeping requirements, and penalties in the
current law had proven effective at deterring the theft of copper and should be
made permanent. Senate Standing Committee Report No. 1240.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next